Utah statutes.
53A-3-407.   Display of American flag.

(1)  Each local school board shall provide each school within the district with a suitable flagpole.

(2)  The American flag shall be displayed on every school day and on every state and national holiday.

(3)  The flag shall be maintained in a respectable condition.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

